New Jersey, session 222, A4962.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  Notwithstanding any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, every State agency required to complete a study pursuant to a law enacted following the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall solicit bids, pursuant to P.L.1954, c.48 (C.52:34-6 et seq.), from public and private institutions of higher education for the completion of such study. b.  If the State agency determines that the acceptance of the lowest responsible bid from a public or private institution of higher education will result either in the payment of an unreasonable price or in a contract otherwise unacceptable pursuant to the statutes and rules governing purchases by that State agency, or if the State agency does not receive responsive bids, the State agency shall reject all bids and withdraw the request for bid proposals.  The State agency shall resolicit bids on an unrestricted basis after the rejection of all bids from public and private institutions of higher education and the withdrawal of the request for bid proposals.  Bidders shall be notified of the cancellation, the reasons for the rejection, and the States intent to resolicit bids on an unrestricted basis.  Public and private institutions of higher education may resubmit bids when the State agency resolicits bids for the completion of such study. c.  As used in this section: Private institutions of higher education means the same as that term is defined in section 2 of P.L.1985, c.103 (C.18A:64J-2). Public institutions of higher education means the same as that term is defined in section 2 of P.L.1985, c.103 (C.18A:64J-2). State agency means any of the principal departments in the Executive Branch of State Government, any division, board, bureau, office, commission, or other instrumentality created by a principal department, and any independent State authority. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.